Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2632.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-100.1.5 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled
"State Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-100.1.5. Building code — Adoption and promulgation by committee.
(a) The state building code standards committee has the authority to adopt, promulgate,
and administer a state building code, which shall include:
(1) Provisions and amendments as necessary including, but not limited to, those necessary
to resolve conflicts between fire safety codes and building codes, as provided for in § 23-28.01-6;
and
(2) A rehabilitation building and fire code for existing buildings and structures.
(b) The building code may be promulgated in several sections, with a section applicable
to:
(1) One-, and two (2)-, three (3)-, and four (4)-family dwellings using the International
Residential Code ("IRC") from the International Code Council (“ICC”), and to three (3) family
dwelling units either using the IRC or by providing the same via an appendix to the Commercial
International Building Code (“IBC”), and any amendments thereto adopted by the state building
code standards committee;
(2) To multiple dwellings with more than four (4) three (3) residential units, and hotels and
motels and other commercial structures using the Commercial International Building Code ("IBC")
from the ICC and any amendments thereto adopted by the state building code standards committee;

(3) An energy conservation code using the International Energy Conservation Code (IECC)
and any amendments thereto adopted by the state building code standards committee; and
(3)(4) To general building construction; to plumbing; and to electrical.
(c) The building code shall incorporate minimum standards for the location, design,
construction, and installation of wells that are appurtenances to a building in applicable sections.
For purposes of this chapter, “appurtenance” includes the installation, alteration, or repair of wells
connected to a structure consistent with chapter 13.2 of title 46.
(d) The building code and the sections thereof shall be reasonably consistent with
recognized and accepted standards adopted by national model code organizations and recognized
authorities. To the extent that any state or local building codes, statutes, or ordinances are
inconsistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Title III, Public Accommodations and
Services Operated by Private Entities, 42 U.S.C. § 12181 et seq., and its regulations and standards,
they are hereby repealed. The state building code standards committee is hereby directed to adopt
rules and regulations consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Titles II and III (28
C.F.R. Part 35 and 28 C.F.R. Part 36, as amended), as soon as possible, but no later than February
15, 2012, to take effect on or before March 15, 2012. The state building code standards committee
is hereby authorized and directed to update those rules and regulations consistent with the future
revisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Standards.
(e) All electrical work done in the state shall be in accordance with the latest edition of the
National Electrical Code (NEC). The state building code standards committee shall adopt the latest
edition of the NEC, including any amendments to the NEC by the committee. The adoption of the
NEC by the commission shall be completed so that it will take effect on the first day of July of the
year the edition is dated.
(f) The 2024 IRC, including any amendments thereto adopted by the building code
standards committee (“BCSC”), shall take effect for one to three (3) family dwelling units not later
than January 1, 2027; provided that, for three (3) family dwelling units the BCSC may provide for
the same results via an appendix to the IBC. The revisions adopting the 2024 IRC and any other
2024 ICC codes, as well as the 2026 National Electric Code (NEC) published by the National Fire
Protection Association (NFPA), including any amendments thereto adopted by the BCSC, shall be
exempt from the provisions of §§ 42-35-2.9(b), 42-35.1-3, and 42-35.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004996/SUB A
========
LC004996/SUB A - Page 2 of 3